utilities/dictionaries/nds_NDS-LowGerman.dic
Aasvagel/S
Achterback/n
achterbang/en
Achterklapp/n
Achternaam/S
Acker/S
Addelkuhl/n
adrett/en
Afdeel/n
Affallammer/S
afhangig/en
Afkaat/n
Aflichter/S
Afsmieten/S
Afsnitt/n
afstrakt/en
Aftaster/S
Afteek/n
Afwater/S
Afwehrer/S
akraat/en
akrater/en
aktiv/en
Alarm/S
alfabeetsch/en
Alfabet/n
allerhööchst/en
allerleegst/en
allgemeen/en
Ammer/S
ammerwies/en
Amööb/n
Andeel/n
Andromeda/S
Angever/S
Angreepslien/n
Angrieper/S
Anlegger/S
Anleggerspant/n
anner/en
Anschriever/S
Ansicht/n
Anslussfleger/S
Antenn/n
anwennbor/en
appeldwatsch/en
Appelsien/n
Appelsina/S
arbeid/qbrjptzuvfx
Arbeitsorner/S
argerlich/en
armer/en
Arm/S
Arvstück/n
Aschammer/S
asiger/en
Assistent/n
Astronom/S
athleetsch/en
Atmosphäär/n
Atomutstieg/en
Autofohrer/S
Autofohrersch/n
automaatsch/en
Aven/S
averglöövsch/en
Babypopp/n
backen/aqrjpuvf
Bäcker/S
backsige/en
Bagen/S
Bagenlien/n
Bahntje/S
Balje/n
Balken/S
Ballong/S
balstürig/en
bang/en
banghaftig/en
Barg/n
Barmbeker/S
basigst/en
Basisklass/n
beden/apv
bedrippst/en
bedrippster/en
Beenschuler/S
Begreep/n
bekannt/en
Kassenbericht/n
Besitter/S
bestännig/en
Bestell/n
Bestseller/S
Betonbodden/S
beweeglich/en
Bewieslast/n
Bidreger/S
Bilddatei/n
Bildkieker/S
billig/en
Bindfaden/S
binnen/aqjtvx
Binnenafwehrersche/n
Binnenmantel/S
bioloogsch/en
Bit/S
Bitrate/n
bitwies/en
bleek/en
Blinker/S
bloot/en
Bomber/S
Boomansicht/n
Börgermeester/S
Borntyp/n
böverst/en
Böverkoppel/S
brede/n
Brenner/S
Brennweert/en
Brüch/n
Brukernaam/S
Bundsgesett/n
Bundssminister/S
butenlännsch/en
Butenmantel/S
Chemiker/S
Christdemokrat/n
christlich/en
Code/S
Dackfenster/n
Daglöhner/S
dampig/en
Dampwulk/n
dannig/en
Dänzer/S
Danzsaal/Sn
Dateinaam/S
Dateivörlaag/n
Datumsformat/n
Deckel/S
deegt/en
Deenst/n
Deenstdeern/S
deenstlich/en
deepdenkersch/en
Deertenkrink/n
Demo/S
demokraatsch/en
Detail/S
dezimal/en
Dia/S
diakritsch/en
dicht/en
dick/en
dickbramsig/en
dickpansig/en
Differenz/n
Dintenplack/en
Discher/S
Dischkant/n
Distrikt/n
Dokter/S
doll/en
doof/en
doon/aptvx
Dööntje/S
Doorhöder/S
Doorhöderhelm/n
Döörnklock/n
Doorrichter/S
Döösbartel/S
dörsichtig/en
Dörsichtigkeit/n
döstig/en
Draagkist/n
Draffrennen/S
drahtloos/en
drang/en
drangvull/en
Dreeangel/S
dreedubbelt/en
Dreeeck/n
dreetimpig/en
Dreiher/S
driest/en
Drievhuuseffekt/en
Dröhnbüdel/S
dröger/en
Druckvöransicht/n
Dschungel/S
Dubbeltweer/S
düchtig/en
Düker/S
dull/en
dünn/en
Düsenfleger/S
duttig/en
Düüs/en
düüsterblau/en
düüsterbruun/en
Dwarslöper/S
dwatsch/en
eckig/en
eenfachst/en
Eenheit/n
Eenhoorn/S
eenzig/en
Eerddeel/n
eerst/en
effektivst/en
egen/en
ehrlich/en
eleganter/en
elektrisch/en
Elektronenvolt/S
elektroonsch/en
elennigst/en
elliptsch/en
Emulator/n
Enerkajak/S
enkelt/en
Enn/n
Eroschoon/S
even/en
Exotischen/en
Exploschoon/n
Extra/S
extragroot/en
falsch/en
famos/en
Faststoff/n
feern/en
Fehler/S
Fehleradress/n
Feldscheedsrichtersche/n
Feldspelersläger/S
Fenstertyp/n
fickerig/en
fien/en
final/en
Fischer/S
Fixtogriep/n
flach/en
Fleetkomma/S
Fleetkommaweert/n
Flegerföhrer/S
Flegerpassageer/en
Flegersellschop/en
Flögelspeler/S
Floogbedrief/en
Flooggesell/n
Floogkaptein/e
Floogkilometer/S
Floogpassageer/en
Floogschöler/S
floogtechensch/en
floogundüchtig/en
Föhrer/S
Fohrt/en
Folterkamer/S
Form/n
Formatteken/S
Fraktaltall/n
freetsch/en
Frist/n
fröher/en
Frömdslötel/S
Fruchtborkeit/n
fründlich/en
Funknettwark/n
gaatlich/en
Gas/n
Gasnevel/S
gauer/en
Gauigkeit/n
geel/en
gefährlichst/en
gegenlöpig/en
geheemst/en
gemeen/en
Generatschoon/n
geograafsch/en
Gever/S
giftig/en
glöhen/arpguvx
gluupsch/en
goor/en
Goorn/S
graafsch/en
Grenzweert/en
griepsch/en
groffer/en
grötter/en
grummel/S
Haas/n
halvig/en
Halter/S
Handsch/n
Hardwarefehler/S
hart/en
heller/en
Helligkeit/n
Helper/S
hierarch'sch/en
Hinnernisrennen/S
hitt/en
hitter/en
höden/bjv
Holtsläger/S
Hööchd/en
Hööftsaak/n
hören/afjptycvx
Hörer/S
hungrig/en
Ieskristallen/n
mien/en
implizit/en
Importfilter/S
industriell/en
Infofenster/n
Inleser/S
interaktiv/en
intern/en
interstelloor/en
invers/en
Inwahner/S
Isotop/n
Jung/S
Kamera/S
Kanal/S
Kaptein/S
Kark/n
karklich/en
Karnsmölten/S
Katteker/S
Keerl/S
keltsch/en
kettelig/en
Kilometer/S
Klappreekner/S
kleen/en
Klöner/S
kloor/en
Koderer/S
köhl/en
Kommentor/n
kommood/en
kompaktst/en
Kompresser/S
Konjunkschoon/n
Kontrolltoorn/S
köller/en
köölst/en
Koortenspill/S
Körper/S
korrekt/en
kortwielig/en
Krall/n
Krater/S
krinkoortet/en
Kroon/n
Krüüzfohrer/S
kryptograafsch/en
Kukuuk/S
künnig/en
Kunstspringer/S
kursiv/en
Küssen/S
laadbor/en
Lager/S
lahm/en
längst/en
Längd/en
langsamst/en
Laserstrahler/S
Layout/S
Ledder/n
leddig/en
leesbor/en
Lehrer/S
lichter/en
lichtblau/en
Lichtborn/S
liedsam/en
lierlütt/en
Limoon/n
lineor/en
Logo/S
Loopplank/n
löösbor/en
Löser/S
lustigst/en
lütter/en
Lüttstdeel/e
Luutspreker/S
egenmaakt/en
magisch/en
magnetisch/en
Maker/S
Malöör/S
Mantel/S
Markt/n
maskuliensch/en
medizinsch/en
Meester/S
Mehrtall/n
mennig/en
Middel/S
Middelstörmer/S
Miegeemk/n
minimalistisch/en
Minister/S
Mitschöler/S
Mobiltelefon/n
mööd/en
Mosaik/n
Multimeter/S
naakt/en
Naam/S
Naver/S
Naverstaat/n
neger/en
nettbaseert/en
neutral/en
noord/n
noordsch/en
Ökelnaam/S
ökoloogsch/en
Onkel/S
oortig/en
Öövflääg/n
Opbospeler/S
Opnehmer/S
Opsläger/S
optimal/en
Order/S
överbreed/en
Övergaav/n
packen/aqbycjpzkgtuvfxü
Paneel/S
Parität/n
Partikel/S
Pastuursche/e
Peerrennen/S
Pergament/n
pielrecht/en
Pilotenkabien/S
Plaaster/S
Plantengift/e
Plaster/S
Plugin/S
Polizist/n
Popo/S
positiv/en
Poster/S
Präsentatschoon/n
problemaatsch/en
profeschonell/en
Proppentrecker/S
Protokoll/n
publik/en
Pulli/S
Püüster/S
Rasen/S
ratschonaal/en
rechteckig/en
Reekner/S
Region/n
relativ/en
Reporter/S
resig/en
richten/afbjptycuv
Riffel/S
riffelig/en
ring/en
ror/en
Rotor/n
Rutgever/S
Saak/n
Schadden/S
scharp/en
schick/en
Schiev/n
Schipper/S
Schrick/n
Schriever/S
schüchtern/en
schuulsam/en
Semikolon/S
sennen/qjtycuvx
Sever/S
sichtbor/en
sieter/en
Skibrill/n
Slachter/S
slanker/en
slimm/en
smölten/qrjpzguvxü
Snack/S
snackhaftig/en
Sneeverweihen/S
Snick/n
Socket/S
Sommer/S
Spektraltyp/n
Speler/S
Spitzer/S
sprütten/qabcjhpzkgtvfxü
staatsch/en
Stang/n
Stapel/S
Steernkieker/S
Stevigkeit/n
Stiegbögel/S
still/en
Straaflien/n
strengst/en
Striepen/S
stumm/en
Sünnenstrahl/n
Sünnenwind/e
swart/en
swatt/en
Swemmbecken/S
swommen/en
Swoormetall/en
Symlink/S
Tähndokter/S
Taktik/n
technisch/en
Tee/S
Teken/S
Tekensett/n
Test/S
Textur/n
Tögel/S
Törn/S
tostännig/en
toveel/en
transzendent/en
Trechter/S
Trick/S
troriger/en
trurigst/en
Tuun/S
Twischenaflaag/n
Ümschalter/S
ümweltverdrääglich/en
unseker/en
URI/S
Utmaker/S
Vader/S
veel/en
veeleckig/en
vereent/en
verföögbor/en
Verköper/S
verscheden/en
virenversüükt/en
virtuell/en
Vörleser/S
vull/en
vullstännig/en
Wachter/S
Wähler/S
Watergraven/S
Wedderbericht/rn
wedderbörstig/en
Wedderwessel/S
welkst/en
weltwied/en
wetenschoplich/en
Wind/n
Winkel/S
winnig/en
Wööst/n
wulkig/en
Zentimeter/S
Hainmöhlen/v
Hamborg/v
Handörp/v
Hannober/v
afrikaansch/en
aserbaidschaansch/en
bosnisch/en
plattdüütsch/en
freesch/en
irsch/en
kanaadsch/en
kroaatsch/en
luxemborgsch/en
nedderlannsch/en
persisch/en
rätoromaansch/en
slaawsch/en
syrsch/en
tschechsch/en
vietnameesch/en
